Hawaii statutes.
§501-156 Partition. In an action for
partition of registered land, after the entry of the final judgment of
partition and the acceptance of the report of the commissioners, if any, a copy
of the judgment and of the return of the commissioners, certified by the clerk
or registrar, as the case may be, shall be filed or recorded and registered.
Thereupon, in case the land is set off to the owners in severalty, any owner is
entitled to have a certificate entered of the share set off to the owner in
severalty. In case the land is ordered by the court to be sold, the purchaser
or the purchaser's assigns are entitled to have a certificate of title entered
on presenting the deed of the commissioners for registration; provided that any
new certificate entered in pursuance of partition proceedings, whether by way
of set off or of sale, shall contain a reference to the final judgment of
partition, and shall be conclusive as to the title to the same extent and
against the same persons as the judgment is made conclusive by the statutes
applicable thereto. Any person holding such certificate of title or a transfer
thereof may petition the court at any time to cancel the memorandum relating to
the judgment and the court, after notice and hearing, may grant the application.
The certificate thereafter is conclusive in the same manner and to the same
extent as other certificates of title. [L 1903, c 56, §86; RL 1925, §3275; RL
1935, §5083; RL 1945, §12683; RL 1955, §342-83; HRS §501-156; am L 1972, c 91,
§1(ff); gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 246, §19; am L 1988, c 346, §17]

Rules of Court

New certificate of title, see RLC rule 59(p).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next